Vermont statutes. Title 1 General Provisions
Chapter 19. Meridian Lines for Towns and Cities

§ 731.
Establishment of meridian lines.

The Governor shall appoint one or more competent persons, one of whom, on application of the selectboard members, shall set out and establish a true meridian line, not less than 100 feet in length, at some convenient place in a town or city, to be selected, provided, and kept by such selectboard members for the free use of all persons.

§ 732.
Markers; record; compensation.

Under the direction of the person so appointed, the selectboard members shall erect suitable stone or iron posts at the extremities of such meridian line, setting the same firmly in the ground, the north post to be marked with the letter M, and the south post with the initial letter or letters of such town or city.
The person so appointed shall make a written description of the same, so that it can be readily known, and cause the same to be recorded in the office of the town or city clerk.
Such person shall receive for his or her services from the treasurer of such town or city $8.00 a day and his or her necessary expenses.